Washington statutes.
RCW 2.64.057

Investigation of conduct occurring prior to, on, or after December 4, 1980.

The commission is authorized to investigate and consider for probative value any conduct that may have occurred prior to, on, or after December 4, 1980, by a person who was, or is now, a judge or justice when such conduct relates to a complaint filed with the commission against the same judge or justice.

[ 1989 c 367 s 5.]

NOTES:

Contingent effective date—1989 c 367: See note following RCW 2.64.010.